Illinois, session 104th, HB3641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 6, 6.1, 6.2-5, 6.3, 8.1, 8.2, 8.3, and 9.2 6and by adding Section 6.4 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 705/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 502)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context otherwise requires:10    "Applicant" means an individual who applies to the Board 11to become certified as a law enforcement officer. 12    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 13Standards Board.14    "Criminal organization" has the meaning given to "gang" as 15that term is defined in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 16Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act. 17    "Full-time law enforcement officer" means a law 18enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 19probationary period and is employed on a full-time basis as a 20law enforcement officer by a local government agency, State 21government agency, or as a campus police officer by a 22university, college, or community college. 23    "Hate group" means an organization or group that, based   HB3641- 2 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1upon its statements, principles, or activities, supports, 2advocates for, threatens, practices, or incites discrimination 3toward, genocide of, or violence toward, actual or perceived: 4race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, sexual 5orientation, physical or mental disability, citizenship, 6immigration status, or national origin of another individual 7or group of individuals, 8    "Law Enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 9police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 10to make arrests. It does not include the Illinois State Police 11as defined in the State Police Act. A law enforcement agency 12may include any university, college, or community college. 13    "Local law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 14unit of government or municipal corporation in this State. It 15does not include the State of Illinois or any office, officer, 16department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 17the State, except that it does include a State-controlled 18university, college or public community college.19    "State law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 20agency of this State. This includes any office, officer, 21department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 22the State. It does not include the Illinois State Police as 23defined in the State Police Act.24    "Outwardly facing social media activity" means all 25content, interaction, or other involvement on or in connection 26with an individual's presence on a social media account that   HB3641- 3 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1is available or otherwise visible or accessible to other users 2of that social media provider. "Outwardly facing social media 3activity" includes social media activity that is available or 4otherwise visible or accessible only to users approved by the 5individual's account, including, but not limited to posts and 6comments containing words, images, or both, reactions to posts 7or comments by other users, or sharing posts or comments by 8other users. "Outwardly facing social media activity" does not 9include private or direct messages on a social media platform. 10    "Panel" means the Certification Review Panel.11    "Participated with" means active and direct involvement 12in, affiliation with, coordination or facilitation of, or 13advocating for or supporting the goals or activities of a 14group.15    "Basic training school" means any school located within 16the State of Illinois whether privately or publicly owned 17which offers a course in basic law enforcement or county 18corrections training and has been approved by the Board.19    "Probationary police officer" means a recruit law 20enforcement officer required to successfully complete initial 21minimum basic training requirements at a basic training school 22to be eligible for permanent full-time employment as a local 23law enforcement officer.24    "Probationary part-time police officer" means a recruit 25part-time law enforcement officer required to successfully 26complete initial minimum part-time training requirements to be   HB3641- 4 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1eligible for employment on a part-time basis as a local law 2enforcement officer.3    "Permanent law enforcement officer" means a law 4enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 5probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 6basis as a local law enforcement officer, as a security 7officer, or campus police officer permanently employed by a 8law enforcement agency.9    "Part-time law enforcement officer" means a law 10enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 11probationary period and is employed on a part-time basis as a 12law enforcement officer or as a campus police officer by a law 13enforcement agency.14    "Public expression of lawlessness or bias" means any 15expression in a public forum, including on outwardly facing 16social media, in discussion forums, in writings, or in 17speeches, advocating for or supporting: the overthrow of 18government; a foreign terrorist organization; a domestic 19terrorist organization; a criminal organization; a hate group; 20or the discrimination toward, genocide of, or violence toward, 21any individual or group of persons based upon actual or 22perceived: race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, gender, 23sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, 24citizenship, immigration status, or national origin of another 25individual or group of individuals. "Public expression of 26lawlessness or bias" includes the public display of any   HB3641- 5 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1tattoo, uniform, insignia, flag, logo, or other similar symbol 2that indicates support for the overthrow of government, a 3foreign terrorist organization, a domestic terrorist group, a 4criminal organization, a hate group, or discrimination toward, 5genocide of, or violence toward any individual or group of 6person for actual or perceived: race, color, creed, religion, 7ancestry, gender, sexual orientation, physical or mental 8disability, citizenship, immigration status, or national 9origin of another individual or group of individuals. Nothing 10in this definition is intended to infringe upon an 11individual's rights pursuant to the First Amendment of the 12United States Constitution.13    "Publicly accessible components of social media accounts" 14means all content, interaction, or other involvement on or in 15connection with an individual's presence on a social media 16account that is available or otherwise visible or accessible 17to members of the public or members of the social media 18platform, without requiring approval by the individual's 19account. 20    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any police officer of 21a law enforcement agency who is primarily responsible for 22prevention or detection of crime and the enforcement of the 23criminal code, traffic, or highway laws of this State or any 24political subdivision of this State or (ii) any member of a 25police force appointed and maintained as provided in Section 2 26of the Railroad Police Act.  HB3641- 6 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    "Recruit" means any full-time or part-time law enforcement 2officer or full-time county corrections officer who is 3enrolled in an approved training course.4    "Review Committee" means the committee at the Board for 5certification disciplinary cases in which the Panel, a law 6enforcement officer, or a law enforcement agency may file for 7reconsideration of a decertification decision made by the 8Board. 9    "Probationary county corrections officer" means a recruit 10county corrections officer required to successfully complete 11initial minimum basic training requirements at a basic 12training school to be eligible for permanent employment on a 13full-time basis as a county corrections officer.14    "Permanent county corrections officer" means a county 15corrections officer who has completed the officer's 16probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 17basis as a county corrections officer by a participating law 18enforcement agency.19    "County corrections officer" means any sworn officer of 20the sheriff who is primarily responsible for the control and 21custody of offenders, detainees or inmates.22    "Probationary court security officer" means a recruit 23court security officer required to successfully complete 24initial minimum basic training requirements at a designated 25training school to be eligible for employment as a court 26security officer.  HB3641- 7 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    "Permanent court security officer" means a court security 2officer who has completed the officer's probationary period 3and is employed as a court security officer by a participating 4law enforcement agency.5    "Court security officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 6Section 3-6012.1 of the Counties Code.7    "Social media accounts" includes, but is not limited to, 8social networking sites, online forums, blogs, and video and 9content sharing platforms.10    "Terrorist organization" has the meaning given to that 11term in subsection (m) of Section 29D-10 of the Criminal Code 12of 2012. 13(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 14    (50 ILCS 705/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 506)15    Sec. 6. Powers and duties of the Board; selection and 16certification of schools. The Board shall select and certify 17schools within the State of Illinois for the purpose of 18providing basic training for probationary law enforcement 19officers, probationary county corrections officers, and court 20security officers and of providing advanced or in-service 21training for permanent law enforcement officers or permanent 22county corrections officers, which schools may be either 23publicly or privately owned and operated. In addition, the 24Board has the following power and duties:25        a. To require law enforcement agencies to furnish such   HB3641- 8 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    reports and information as the Board deems necessary to 2    fully implement this Act.3        b. To establish appropriate mandatory minimum 4    standards relating to the training of probationary local 5    law enforcement officers or probationary county 6    corrections officers, and in-service training of permanent 7    law enforcement officers.8        c. (blank). To provide appropriate certification to 9    those probationary officers who successfully complete the 10    prescribed minimum standard basic training course.11        c-5. To determine whether an applicant has met the 12    requirements of this Act and is qualified to be employed 13    as a law enforcement officer and to issue a certificate to 14    applicants qualified to be employed as a law enforcement 15    officer. 16        d. To review and approve annual training curriculum 17    for county sheriffs.18        e. (blank). To review and approve applicants to ensure 19    that no applicant is admitted to a certified academy 20    unless the applicant is a person of good character and has 21    not been convicted of, found guilty of, entered a plea of 22    guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony 23    offense, any of the misdemeanors in Sections 11-1.50, 24    11-6, 11-6.5, 11-6.6, 11-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1, 25    11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 26    26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, any misdemeanor in   HB3641- 9 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    violation of any Section of Part E of Title III of the 2    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 3    subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code of 4    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 5 or 5.2 of 5    the Cannabis Control Act, or a crime involving moral 6    turpitude under the laws of this State or any other state 7    which if committed in this State would be punishable as a 8    felony or a crime of moral turpitude, or any felony or 9    misdemeanor in violation of federal law or the law of any 10    state that is the equivalent of any of the offenses 11    specified therein. The Board may appoint investigators who 12    shall enforce the duties conferred upon the Board by this 13    Act.14        For purposes of this paragraph e, a person is 15    considered to have been convicted of, found guilty of, or 16    entered a plea of guilty to, plea of nolo contendere to 17    regardless of whether the adjudication of guilt or 18    sentence is withheld or not entered thereon. This includes 19    sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, or first 20    offender probation, or any similar disposition provided 21    for by law. 22        e-5. To hire investigators for the purposes of 23    complying with this Act. The Board's investigators shall 24    be law enforcement officers. The Board shall not waive the 25    training requirement unless the investigator has had a 26    minimum of 5 years experience as a sworn law enforcement   HB3641- 10 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    officer in this State. Any complaint under Section 6.3 2    filed against the Board's investigators shall be 3    investigated by the Illinois State Police. 4        f. To establish statewide standards for minimum 5    standards regarding regular mental health screenings for 6    probationary and permanent police officers, ensuring that 7    counseling sessions and screenings remain confidential. 8        g. To review and ensure all law enforcement officers 9    remain in compliance with this Act, and any administrative 10    rules adopted under this Act.11        h. To suspend any certificate for a definite period, 12    limit or restrict any certificate, or revoke any 13    certificate.14        i. The Board and the Panel shall have power to secure 15    by its subpoena and bring before it any person or entity in 16    this State and to take testimony either orally or by 17    deposition or both with the same fees and mileage and in 18    the same manner as prescribed by law in judicial 19    proceedings in civil cases in circuit courts of this 20    State. The Board and the Panel shall also have the power to 21    subpoena the production of documents, papers, files, 22    books, documents, and records, whether in physical or 23    electronic form, in support of the charges and for 24    defense, and in connection with a hearing or 25    investigation.26        j. The Executive Director, the administrative law   HB3641- 11 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    judge designated by the Executive Director, and each 2    member of the Board and the Panel shall have the power to 3    administer oaths to witnesses at any hearing that the 4    Board is authorized to conduct under this Act and any 5    other oaths required or authorized to be administered by 6    the Board under this Act.7        k. In case of the neglect or refusal of any person to 8    obey a subpoena issued by the Board and the Panel, any 9    circuit court, upon application of the Board and the 10    Panel, through the Illinois Attorney General, may order 11    such person to appear before the Board and the Panel give 12    testimony or produce evidence, and any failure to obey 13    such order is punishable by the court as a contempt 14    thereof. This order may be served by personal delivery, by 15    email, or by mail to the address of record or email address 16    of record. 17        l. The Board shall have the power to administer state 18    certification examinations. Any and all records related to 19    these examinations, including, but not limited to, test 20    questions, test formats, digital files, answer responses, 21    answer keys, and scoring information shall be exempt from 22    disclosure. 23        m. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to units 24    of local government and public institutions of higher 25    education for the purposes of hiring and retaining law 26    enforcement officers.   HB3641- 12 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        n. To make grants, subject to appropriation, to local 2    law enforcement agencies for costs associated with the 3    expansion and support of National Integrated Ballistic 4    Information Network (NIBIN) and other ballistic technology 5    equipment for ballistic testing. 6        o. To create, within the Board, a Statewide 7    Enforcement Unit. The Statewide Enforcement Unit shall be 8    responsible for the investigation of matters under 9    Sections 6.1 and 6.3, and the prosecution of matters under 10    Sections 6.1, 6.3, and 6.4. 11(Source: P.A. 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 12102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 13    (50 ILCS 705/6.1)14    Sec. 6.1. Automatic decertification of full-time and 15part-time law enforcement officers. 16    (a) The Board must review law enforcement officer conduct 17and records to ensure that no law enforcement officer is 18certified or provided a valid waiver if that law enforcement 19officer has been convicted of, found guilty of, entered a plea 20of guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony 21offense under the laws of this State or any other state which 22if committed in this State would be punishable as a felony. The 23Board must also ensure that no law enforcement officer is 24certified or provided a valid waiver if that law enforcement 25officer has been convicted of, found guilty of, or entered a   HB3641- 13 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1plea of guilty to, on or after January 1, 2022 (the effective 2date of Public Act 101-652) of any misdemeanor specified in 3this Section or if committed in any other state would be an 4offense similar to Section 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-6.5, 11-6.6, 511-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 612-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, 7any misdemeanor in violation of any Section of Part E of Title 8III of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 9or subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code of 1961 10or the Criminal Code of 2012, or to Section 5 or 5.2 of the 11Cannabis Control Act, or any felony or misdemeanor in 12violation of federal law or the law of any state that is the 13equivalent of any of the offenses specified therein. The Board 14must appoint investigators to enforce the duties conferred 15upon the Board by this Act. 16    (a-1) For purposes of this Section, "conviction" has the 17meaning given to that term in Section 2-5 of the Criminal Code 18of 2012. a person is "convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty 19to, plea of nolo contendere to, found guilty of" regardless of 20whether the adjudication of guilt or sentence is withheld or 21not entered thereon. This includes sentences of supervision, 22conditional discharge, or first offender probation, or any 23similar disposition provided for by law. 24    (a-2) A law enforcement officer found to be in violation 25of subsection (a) shall be served with the notice of intent to 26decertify by both certified and regular mail at the last known   HB3641- 14 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1address of record on file with the most recent law enforcement 2employer. The notification shall include a statement of 3determination, reasons for decertification, and the law 4enforcement officer's rights to contest and appeal under 5Section 6.4. If the law enforcement officer not appeal within 6the time period specified in Section 6.4, then the Board may 7deem the law enforcement officer decertified. 8    (b) It is the responsibility of the sheriff or the chief 9executive officer of every law enforcement agency or 10department within this State to report to the Board any 11arrest, conviction, finding of guilt, plea of guilty, or plea 12of nolo contendere to, of any officer for an offense 13identified in this Section, regardless of whether the 14adjudication of guilt or sentence is withheld or not entered 15thereon, this includes sentences of supervision, conditional 16discharge, or first offender probation. 17    (c) It is the duty and responsibility of every full-time 18and part-time law enforcement officer in this State to report 19to the Board within 14 days, and the officer's sheriff or chief 20executive officer, of the officer's arrest, conviction, found 21guilty of, or plea of guilty for an offense identified in this 22Section. Failure of a convicted person to report to the Board 23the officer's conviction as described in this Section or any 24continued law enforcement practice after receiving a 25conviction is a Class 4 felony. Any full-time or part-time law 26enforcement officer who knowingly makes, submits, causes to be   HB3641- 15 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1submitted, or files a false or untruthful report to the Board 2must have the officer's certificate or waiver immediately 3decertified or revoked. 4    (d) Any person, or a local or State agency, or the Board is 5immune from liability for submitting, disclosing, or releasing 6information of arrests, convictions, or pleas of guilty in 7this Section as long as the information is submitted, 8disclosed, or released in good faith and without malice. The 9Board has qualified immunity for the release of the 10information. 11    (e) (blank). Any full-time or part-time law enforcement 12officer with a certificate or waiver issued by the Board who is 13convicted of, found guilty of, or entered a plea of guilty to, 14or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any offense described 15in this Section immediately becomes decertified or no longer 16has a valid waiver. The decertification and invalidity of 17waivers occurs as a matter of law. Failure of a convicted 18person to report to the Board the officer's conviction as 19described in this Section or any continued law enforcement 20practice after receiving a conviction is a Class 4 felony. 21    For purposes of this Section, a person is considered to 22have been "convicted of, found guilty of, or entered a plea of 23guilty to, plea of nolo contendere to" regardless of whether 24the adjudication of guilt or sentence is withheld or not 25entered thereon, including sentences of supervision, 26conditional discharge, first offender probation, or any   HB3641- 16 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1similar disposition as provided for by law. 2    (e-5) If a timely appeal is not made, or if the Board 3denies the appeal, decertification shall occur as a matter of 4law. 5    (f) (blank). The Board's investigators shall be law 6enforcement officers as defined in Section 2 of this Act. The 7Board shall not waive the training requirement unless the 8investigator has had a minimum of 5 years experience as a sworn 9officer of a local, State, or federal law enforcement agency. 10An investigator shall not have been terminated for good cause, 11decertified, had his or her law enforcement license or 12certificate revoked in this or any other jurisdiction, or been 13convicted of any of the conduct listed in subsection (a). Any 14complaint filed against the Board's investigators shall be 15investigated by the Illinois State Police. 16    (g) The Board must request and receive information and 17assistance from any federal, state, local, or private 18enforcement agency as part of the authorized criminal 19background investigation. The Illinois State Police must 20process, retain, and additionally provide and disseminate 21information to the Board concerning criminal charges, arrests, 22convictions, and their disposition, that have been filed 23against a basic academy applicant, law enforcement applicant, 24or law enforcement officer whose fingerprint identification 25cards are on file or maintained by the Illinois State Police. 26The Federal Bureau of Investigation must provide the Board any   HB3641- 17 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1criminal history record information contained in its files 2pertaining to law enforcement officers or any applicant to a 3Board certified basic law enforcement academy as described in 4this Act based on fingerprint identification. The Board must 5make payment of fees to the Illinois State Police for each 6fingerprint card submission in conformance with the 7requirements of paragraph 22 of Section 55a of the Civil 8Administrative Code of Illinois. 9    (g-5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 10contrary, the changes to this Section made by this amendatory 11Act of the 102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 shall 12apply prospectively only from July 1, 2022.13    (h) Appeals of decisions in this Section shall be governed 14by Section 6.4.15    (i) Any law enforcement officer who knowingly makes, 16submits, causes to be submitted, or files a false or 17untruthful report to the Board shall be decertified.18(Source: P.A. 101-187, eff. 1-1-20; 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 20    (50 ILCS 705/6.2-5 new)21    Sec. 6.2-5. Obligations of law enforcement agencies.22    (a) Before a law enforcement agency may appoint a law 23enforcement officer or a person seeking a certification as a 24law enforcement officer in this State, the chief executive 25officer, sheriff, appointing authority, or designee must:  HB3641- 18 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (1) perform a criminal background check including 2    reviewing criminal history and national decertification 3    indices, and all disciplinary records by any previous law 4    enforcement or correctional employer, including complaints 5    or investigations of misconduct, including the outcome of 6    any investigation regardless of the result, and the reason 7    for separation from employment;8            (A) Previous law enforcement or corrections 9        employers must provide this information, including the 10        reason for separation from employment with the law 11        enforcement agency, within 30 days of receiving a 12        written request from the law enforcement agency 13        conducting the background check.14            (B) Documentation of the contact between law 15        enforcement agencies must be available for review by 16        the Board for a minimum of 5 years after the law 17        enforcement's termination, retirement, resignation, or 18        another separation with that law enforcement agency.19        (2) check the Officer Professional Conduct Database;20        (3) verify from the local prosecuting authority in any 21    jurisdiction in which the applicant has served as to 22    whether the applicant is on any impeachment disclosure 23    lists; and24        (4) inquire into whether the applicant has any past or 25    present affiliations with terrorist organizations.26    A prospective employing law enforcement agency may   HB3641- 19 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1establish higher standards for background investigations of 2applicants if those standards are not contrary to State or 3federal law.4    (b) Obligations for law enforcement officer reporting and 5recordkeeping.6        (1) All law enforcement agencies shall create and 7    maintain the following records for each officer:8            (A) The date the law enforcement officer was 9        hired.10            (B) With respect to any separation from 11        employment:12                (i) The date of separation of employment.13                (ii) The nature of any separation, including, 14            but not limited to, retirement, resignation, or 15            termination of employment.16                (iii) If the law enforcement agency initiated 17            the separation, then the reason given to the 18            officer.19                (iv) The reason the law enforcement officer 20            was terminated if the law enforcement officer was 21            terminated for cause.22                (v) If known to the law enforcement agency, 23            then whether the separation occurred while the law 24            enforcement agency or any other entity was 25            conducting an investigation of the law enforcement 26            officer based on allegations that the law   HB3641- 20 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1            enforcement officer violated any rule, policy, 2            procedure, law, or engaged in other misconduct 3            covered by this Act.4            (C) A record of the background check performed by 5        the law enforcement agency.6            (D) A record reflecting each type of complaint 7        against, investigation of, and discipline of the 8        officer known to the law enforcement agency, including 9        each:10                (i) sustained complaint against the officer. 11            For the purposes of this item, a "sustained 12            complaint" means a complaint in which the 13            investigation produced a preponderance of evidence 14            to prove the allegation of an act that was 15            determined to be misconduct;16                (ii) investigation of the officer by an 17            internal affairs unit, an internal review board, a 18            civilian oversight board, or a comparable body;19                (iii) arrest of the officer;20                (iv) discipline imposed on the officer, 21            including any last chance agreement or separation 22            agreement;23                (v) criminal prosecution against the officer;24                (vi) written reprimand of the officer;25                (vii) suspension of the law enforcement 26            officer's employment or order that the officer   HB3641- 21 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1            take a leave from employment;2                (viii) determination by a prosecutor's 3            office's that the officer is not be called as a 4            witness in court or that the officer's misconduct 5            must be disclosed to defendants; and6                (ix) complaint, investigation, or disciplinary 7            matter vacated or resolved in favor of the 8            officer;9            (E) A record reflecting each form of in-service 10        training, retraining, and training on policies that 11        the officer completed, whether or not such training is 12        required by this Act;13    Information compiled in this Section shall be available 14for review by hiring agencies for the purpose of hiring 15background checks and for the Board for the purpose of 16evaluation of aggravating and mitigating factors under Section 176.3.18        (2) All law enforcement agencies and the Illinois 19    State Police shall notify the Board of any final 20    determination of a willful violation of department, law 21    enforcement agency, or the Illinois State Police policy, 22    official misconduct, or violation of law within 10 days 23    when:24            (A) the determination leads to a suspension of at 25        least 10 days;26            (B) any infraction that would trigger an official   HB3641- 22 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        or formal investigation under a law enforcement agency 2        or the Illinois State Police policy;3            (C) there is an allegation of misconduct or 4        regarding truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or 5        integrity; or6            (D) the officer resigns or retires during the 7        course of an investigation and the officer has been 8        served notice that the officer is under investigation.9    Agencies and the Illinois State Police may report to the 10Board any conduct they deem appropriate to disseminate to 11another law enforcement agency regarding a law enforcement 12officer.13        (3) The law enforcement agency or the Illinois State 14    Police shall report to the Board within 10 days of a final 15    determination and final exhaustion of any administrative 16    appeal, contractual dispute resolution process, or the law 17    enforcement officer's resignation or retirement, and shall 18    provide information regarding the nature of the violation. 19    This notification shall not necessarily trigger 20    certification review.21        (4) A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State 22    Police shall be immune from liability for a disclosure 23    made as described in this subsection, unless the 24    disclosure would constitute intentional misrepresentation 25    or gross negligence.26        (5) Within 14 days after receiving notification from a   HB3641- 23 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    law enforcement agency or the Illinois State Police, the 2    Board must notify the law enforcement officer of the 3    report and the officer's right to provide a statement 4    regarding the reported violation. The law enforcement 5    officer shall have 14 days from receiving notice to 6    provide a written objection contesting information 7    included in the law enforcement agency's report. The 8    objection must be filed with the Board on a form 9    prescribed by the Board and a copy must be provided by the 10    law enforcement agency. The objection shall remain in the 11    Officer Professional Conduct Database with the reported 12    violation.13    (c) Penalties.14        (1) All law enforcement agencies are required to 15    comply with the provisions of this Act and the rules 16    adopted under this Act. Whenever the Board finds that any 17    law enforcement agency is in violation of any provision of 18    this Act, or any rule adopted under this Act, the Board 19    shall notify the law enforcement agency of the violation 20    and of the law enforcement agency's duty to comply with 21    the provision or rule. This notification of non-compliance 22    shall be sent to the law enforcement agency head via 23    certified U.S. Mail or delivered by hand. The notice shall 24    include a specific reference to the statute or regulation 25    that the law enforcement agency has violated, the periods 26    of alleged violation, and a brief statement of the factual   HB3641- 24 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    basis for the finding of violation along with any 2    supporting materials.3    The law enforcement agency must come into compliance 4within 30 days.5        (2) If after 30 days the law enforcement agency has 6    failed to come into compliance, then the Board shall issue 7    an order of failure to respond to the Notice of 8    non-compliance. This order may include a civil penalty not 9    to exceed $1,000 per violation per day the law enforcement 10    agency is not in compliance. This penalty shall be payable 11    to the Board. The Board shall send a notice to a right to a 12    conference to challenge the finding of non-compliance 13    under Section 6.4 and a calculation of the penalty owed 14    including the date from which the penalty should be 15    calculated.  16    (50 ILCS 705/6.3)17    Sec. 6.3. Discretionary decertification of full-time and 18part-time law enforcement officers.19    (a) Definitions. For purposes of this Section 6.3:20    "Duty to intervene" means an obligation to intervene to 21prevent harm from occurring that arises when: an officer is 22present, and has reason to know (1) that excessive force is 23being used or that any constitutional violation has been 24committed by a law enforcement official; and (2) the officer 25has a realistic opportunity to intervene. This duty applies   HB3641- 25 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1equally to supervisory and nonsupervisory officers. If aid is 2required, the officer shall not, when reasonable to administer 3aid, knowingly and willingly refuse to render aid as defined 4by State or federal law. An officer does not violate this duty 5if the failure to render aid is due to circumstances such as 6lack of appropriate specialized training, lack of resources or 7equipment, or if it is unsafe or impracticable to render aid. 8    "Excessive use of force" means using force in violation of 9State or federal law.10    "False statement" means (1) any knowingly false statement 11provided on a form or report, (2) that the writer does not 12believe to be true, and (3) that the writer includes to mislead 13a public servant in performing the public servant's official 14functions.15    "Perjury" means that as defined under Sections 32-2 and 1632-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.17    "Tampers with or fabricates evidence" means if a law 18enforcement officer (1) has reason to believe that an official 19proceeding is pending or may be instituted, and (2) alters, 20destroys, conceals, or removes any record, document, data, 21video or thing to impair its validity or availability in the 22proceeding.23    (b) Decertification conduct. The Board has the authority 24to decertify a full-time or a part-time law enforcement 25officer upon a determination by the Board that the law 26enforcement officer has:  HB3641- 26 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (1) committed an act that would constitute a felony or 2    misdemeanor which could serve as basis for automatic 3    decertification, whether or not the law enforcement 4    officer was criminally prosecuted, and whether or not the 5    law enforcement officer's employment was terminated;6        (2) exercised excessive use of force;7        (3) failed to comply with the officer's duty to 8    intervene, including through acts or omissions;9        (4) tampered with a dash camera or body-worn camera or 10    data recorded by a dash camera or body-worn camera or 11    directed another to tamper with or turn off a dash camera 12    or body-worn camera or data recorded by a dash camera or 13    body-worn camera for the purpose of concealing, destroying 14    or altering potential evidence;15        (5) engaged in the following conduct relating to the 16    reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime: 17    committed perjury, made a false statement, or knowingly 18    tampered with or fabricated evidence; or and19        (6) engaged in any unprofessional, unethical, 20    deceptive, or deleterious conduct or practice harmful to 21    the public; such conduct or practice need not have 22    resulted in actual injury to any person. As used in this 23    paragraph, the term "unprofessional conduct" shall include 24    any departure from, or failure to conform to, the minimal 25    standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of an 26    officer.  HB3641- 27 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    (b-5) The Board has the authority to decertify a full-time 2or part-time law enforcement officer notwithstanding whether a 3law enforcement agency takes disciplinary action against a law 4enforcement officer for the same underlying conduct as 5outlined in subsection (b).6    (c) Notice of Alleged Violation.7        (1) The following individuals and agencies shall 8    notify the Board within 7 days of becoming aware of any 9    violation described in subsection (b):10            (A) A law enforcement agency as defined in Section 11        2 or any law enforcement officer of this State. For 12        this subsection (c), law enforcement agency includes, 13        but is not limited to, a civilian review board, an 14        inspector general, and legal counsel for a law 15        enforcement agency.16            (B) The Executive Director of the Board;17            (C) A State's Attorney's Office of this State.18        "Becoming aware" does not include confidential 19    communications between agency lawyers and agencies 20    regarding legal advice. For purposes of this subsection, 21    "law enforcement agency" does not include the Illinois 22    Attorney General when providing legal representation to a 23    law enforcement officer under the State Employee 24    Indemnification Act.25        (2) Any person may also notify the Board of any 26    conduct the person believes a law enforcement officer has   HB3641- 28 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    committed as described in subsection (b). Such 2    notifications may be made confidentially. Notwithstanding 3    any other provision in state law or any collective 4    bargaining agreement, the Board shall accept notice and 5    investigate any allegations from individuals who remain 6    confidential.7        (3) Upon written request, the Board shall disclose to 8    the individual or entity who filed a notice of violation 9    the status of the Board's review.10    (d) Form. The notice of violation reported under 11subsection (c) shall be on a form prescribed by the Board in 12its rules. The form shall be publicly available by paper and 13electronic means. The form shall include fields for the 14following information, at a minimum:15        (1) the full name, address, and telephone number of 16    the person submitting the notice;17        (2) if submitted under subsection (c)(1), the agency 18    name and title of the person submitting the notice;19        (3) the full name, badge number, employing agency, and 20    physical description of the officer, if known;21        (4) the full name or names, address or addresses, 22    telephone number or numbers, and physical description or 23    descriptions of any witnesses, if known;24        (5) a concise statement of facts that describe the 25    alleged violation and any copies of supporting evidence 26    including but not limited to any photographic, video, or   HB3641- 29 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    audio recordings of the incident;2        (6) whether the person submitting the notice has 3    notified any other agency; and4        (7) an option for an individual, who submits directly 5    to the Board, to consent to have the individual's identity 6    disclosed. The identity of any individual providing 7    information or reporting any possible or alleged violation 8    to the Board shall be kept confidential and may not be 9    disclosed without the consent of that individual, unless 10    the individual consents to disclosure of the individual's 11    name or disclosure of the individual's identity is 12    otherwise required by law. The confidentiality granted by 13    this subsection does not preclude the disclosure of the 14    identity of a person in any capacity other than as the 15    source of an allegation. 16    Nothing in this subsection (d) shall preclude the Board 17from receiving, investigating, or acting upon allegations made 18confidentially or in a format different from the form provided 19for in this subsection.20    (e) Preliminary review.21        (1) The Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall 22    complete a preliminary review of the allegations to 23    determine whether there is sufficient information to 24    warrant a further investigation of any violations of the 25    Act. Upon initiating a preliminary review of the 26    allegations, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall   HB3641- 30 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    notify the head of the law enforcement agency that employs 2    the law enforcement officer who is the subject of the 3    allegations. At the request of the Statewide Enforcement 4    Unit Board, the law enforcement agency must submit any 5    copies of investigative findings, evidence, or 6    documentation to the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board in 7    accordance with rules adopted by the Statewide Enforcement 8    Unit Board to facilitate the Statewide Enforcement Unit's 9    Board's preliminary review. The Statewide Enforcement Unit 10    Board may correspond with the law enforcement agency, 11    official records clerks or any investigative agencies in 12    conducting its preliminary review.13        (2) During the preliminary review, the Statewide 14    Enforcement Unit Board will take all reasonable steps to 15    discover any and all objective verifiable evidence 16    relevant to the alleged violation through the 17    identification, retention, review, and analysis of all 18    currently available evidence, including, but not limited 19    to: all time-sensitive evidence, audio and video evidence, 20    physical evidence, arrest reports, photographic evidence, 21    GPS records, computer data, lab reports, medical 22    documents, and witness interviews. All reasonable steps 23    will be taken to preserve relevant evidence identified 24    during the preliminary investigation.25        (3) If after a preliminary review of the alleged 26    violation or violations, the Statewide Enforcement Unit   HB3641- 31 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    Board believes there is sufficient information to warrant 2    further investigation of any violations of this Act, the 3    alleged violation or violations shall be assigned for 4    investigation in accordance with subsection (f).5        (4) If after a review of the allegations, the 6    Statewide Enforcement Unit Board believes there is 7    insufficient information supporting the allegations to 8    warrant further investigation, it may close a notice. 9    Notification of the Statewide Enforcement Unit's Board's 10    decision to close a notice shall be sent to all relevant 11    individuals, agencies, and any entities that received 12    notice of the violation under subsection (c) within 30 13    days of the notice being closed, except in cases where the 14    notice is submitted anonymously if the complainant is 15    unknown.16        (5) Except when the Board has received notice under 17    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c), no 18    later than 30 days after receiving notice, the Statewide 19    Enforcement Unit Board shall report any notice of 20    violation it receives to the relevant law enforcement 21    agency, unless reporting the notice would jeopardize any 22    subsequent investigation. The Board shall also record any 23    notice of violation it receives to the Officer 24    Professional Conduct Database in accordance with Section 25    9.2. The Board shall report to the appropriate State's 26    Attorney any alleged violations that contain allegations,   HB3641- 32 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    claims, or factual assertions that, if true, would 2    constitute a violation of Illinois law. The Statewide 3    Enforcement Unit Board shall inform the law enforcement 4    officer via certified mail that it has received a notice 5    of violation against the law enforcement officer.6        If the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board determines 7    that due to the circumstances and the nature of the 8    allegation that it would not be prudent to notify the law 9    enforcement officer and the officer's law enforcement 10    agency unless and until the filing of charges a Formal 11    Complaint, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall 12    document in the file the reason or reasons a notification 13    was not made.14        (6) If the law enforcement officer is involved in a 15    criminal proceeding on the same subject as the notice of 16    violation, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board is 17    responsible for maintaining a current status report 18    including court dates, hearings, pleas, adjudication 19    status and sentencing. A State's Attorney's Office must 20    notify the Board of any criminal charges filed against a 21    law enforcement officer, and must provide updates of 22    significant developments to the Board in a timely manner 23    but no later than 30 days after such developments.24    (f) Investigations; requirements. Investigations are to be 25assigned after a preliminary review, unless the investigations 26were closed under paragraph (4) of subsection (e), as follows   HB3641- 33 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection (f).2        (1) A law enforcement agency that submits a notice of 3    violation to the Board under subparagraph (A) of paragraph 4    (1) of subsection (c) shall be responsible for conducting 5    an investigation of the underlying allegations except 6    when: (i) the law enforcement agency refers the notice to 7    another law enforcement agency or the Statewide 8    Enforcement Unit Board for investigation and such other 9    agency or the Board agrees to conduct the investigation; 10    (ii) an external, independent, or civilian oversight 11    agency conducts the investigation in accordance with local 12    ordinance or other applicable law; or (iii) the Executive 13    Director Board has determined that it will conduct the 14    investigation based upon the facts and circumstances of 15    the alleged violation, including but not limited to, 16    investigations regarding the Chief or Sheriff of a law 17    enforcement agency, familial conflict of interests, 18    complaints involving a substantial portion of a law 19    enforcement agency, or complaints involving a policy of a 20    law enforcement agency. Any agency or entity conducting an 21    investigation under this paragraph (1) shall submit 22    quarterly reports to the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board 23    regarding the progress of the investigation. The quarterly 24    report shall be reviewed by the individual or individuals 25    at the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board who conducted the 26    preliminary review, if available.   HB3641- 34 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    Any agency or entity conducting an investigation under 2    this paragraph (1) shall, within 7 days of completing an 3    investigation, deliver an Investigative Summary Report and 4    copies of any administrative evidence to the Statewide 5    Enforcement Unit Board. If the Executive Director Board 6    finds an investigation conducted under this paragraph (1) 7    is incomplete, unsatisfactory, or deficient in any way, 8    the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board may direct the 9    investigating entity or agency to take any additional 10    investigative steps deemed necessary to thoroughly and 11    satisfactorily complete the investigation, or the Board 12    may take any steps necessary to complete the 13    investigation. The investigating entity or agency or, when 14    necessary, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board will then 15    amend and re-submit the Investigative Summary Report to 16    the Executive Director Board for approval.17        The Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall submit a 18    report to the investigating entity disclosing the name, 19    address, and telephone numbers of persons who have 20    knowledge of facts which are the subject of the 21    investigation and identifying the subject matter of their 22    knowledge. 23        (2) The Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall 24    investigate and complete an Investigative Summary Report 25    when a State's Attorney's Office submits a notice of 26    violation to the Board under (c)(1)(C).  HB3641- 35 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (3) When a person submits a notice to the Statewide 2    Enforcement Unit Board under paragraph (2) of subsection 3    (c), The Board shall assign the investigation to the law 4    enforcement agency that employs the law enforcement 5    officer, except when: (i) the law enforcement agency 6    requests to refer the notice to another law enforcement 7    agency or the Board for investigation and such other 8    agency or the Board agrees to conduct the investigation; 9    (ii) an external, independent, or civilian oversight 10    agency conducts the investigation in accordance with local 11    ordinance or other applicable law; or (iii) the Executive 12    Director Board has determined that it will conduct the 13    investigation based upon the facts and circumstances of 14    the alleged violation, including but not limited to, 15    investigations regarding the Sheriff or Chief Chief or 16    Sheriff of a law enforcement agency, familial conflict of 17    interests, complaints involving a substantial portion of a 18    law enforcement agency, or complaints involving a policy 19    of a law enforcement agency. 20        The investigating entity or agency shall submit 21    quarterly reports to the Board regarding the progress of 22    the investigation in a form to be determined by the Board. 23    The quarterly report shall be reviewed by the individual 24    at the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board who conducted the 25    preliminary review, if available. 26    The investigating entity or agency shall, within 7 days of   HB3641- 36 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    completing an investigation, deliver an Investigative 2    Summary Report and copies of any evidence to the Statewide 3    Enforcement Unit and the Executive Director Board. If the 4    Statewide Enforcement Unit or Executive Director Board 5    finds an investigation conducted under this subsection 6    (f)(3) is incomplete, unsatisfactory, biased, or deficient 7    in any way, the Executive Director Board may direct the 8    investigating entity to take any additional investigative 9    steps deemed necessary to thoroughly and satisfactorily 10    complete the investigation, or the Statewide Enforcement 11    Unit Board may take any steps necessary to complete the 12    investigation. The investigating entity or agency or, when 13    necessary, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board will then 14    amend and re-submit the Investigative Summary Report to 15    the Executive Director Board for approval. The 16    investigating entity shall cooperate with and assist the 17    Statewide Enforcement Unit Board, as necessary, in any 18    subsequent investigation.19        (4) Concurrent Investigations. The Statewide 20    Enforcement Unit Board may, at any point, initiate a 21    concurrent investigation under this Section section. The 22    original investigating entity shall timely communicate, 23    coordinate, and cooperate with the Statewide Enforcement 24    Unit Board to the fullest extent. The Board shall 25    promulgate rules that shall address, at a minimum, the 26    sharing of information and investigative means such as   HB3641- 37 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    subpoenas and interviewing witnesses.2        (5) Investigative Summary Report. An Investigative 3    Summary Report shall contain, at a minimum, the 4    allegations and elements within each allegation followed 5    by the testimonial, documentary, or physical evidence that 6    is relevant to each such allegation or element listed and 7    discussed in association with it. All persons who have 8    been interviewed and listed in the Investigative Summary 9    Report will be identified as a complainant, witness, 10    person with specialized knowledge, or law enforcement 11    employee.12        (6) Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a written 13    policy regarding the investigation of conduct under 14    subsection (a) that involves a law enforcement officer 15    employed by that law enforcement agency. The written 16    policy adopted must include the following, at a minimum:17            (a) Each law enforcement officer shall immediately 18        report any conduct under subsection (b) to the 19        appropriate supervising officer.20            (b) The written policy under this Section shall be 21        available for inspection and copying under the Freedom 22        of Information Act, and not subject to any exemption 23        of that Act.24        (7) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a law 25    enforcement agency from conducting an investigation for 26    the purpose of internal discipline. However, any such   HB3641- 38 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    investigation shall be conducted in a manner that avoids 2    interference with, and preserves the integrity of, any 3    separate investigation by the Statewide Enforcement Unit 4    Board being conducted.5        (8) The Board, executive director, and investigators 6    performing investigations conducted under this Section 7    shall preserve all evidence. This information shall be 8    contained in a single investigation file. Upon the filing 9    of formal complaint seeking decertification, the 10    investigation file shall be subject to unredacted 11    disclosure to the law enforcement officer subject of the 12    investigation. 13    (g) Formal complaints. Upon receipt of an Investigative 14Summary Report, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall 15review the Report and any relevant evidence obtained and 16determine whether there is reasonable basis to believe that 17the law enforcement officer committed any conduct that would 18be deemed a violation of this Act. If after reviewing the 19Report and any other relevant evidence obtained, the Statewide 20Enforcement Unit Board determines that a reasonable basis does 21exist, the Statewide Enforcement Unit Board shall file a 22formal complaint with the Certification Review Panel.23    (h) Formal Complaint Hearing.24        (1) Upon issuance of a formal complaint by the 25    Enforcement Unit, the Panel shall set the matter for an 26    initial hearing in front of an administrative law judge.   HB3641- 39 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    At least 30 days before the date set for an initial 2    hearing, the Panel must, in writing, notify the law 3    enforcement officer subject to the complaint of the 4    following:5            (i) the allegations against the law enforcement 6        officer, the time and place for the hearing, and 7        whether the law enforcement officer's certification 8        has been temporarily suspended under Section 8.3;9            (ii) the right to file a written answer to the 10        complaint with the Panel within 30 days after service 11        of the notice;12            (iii) that if the law enforcement officer fails to 13        comply with the notice of the default order in 14        paragraph (2), the Panel shall enter a default order 15        against the law enforcement officer along with a 16        finding that the allegations in the complaint are 17        deemed admitted, and that the law enforcement 18        officer's certification may be revoked as a result; 19        and20            (iv) that the law enforcement officer may request 21        an informal conference to surrender the officer's 22        certification.23        (2) The Board shall send the law enforcement officer 24    notice of the default order. The notice shall state that 25    the officer has 30 days to notify the Board in writing of 26    their desire to have the order vacated and to appear   HB3641- 40 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    before the Board. If the law enforcement officer does not 2    notify the Board within 30 days, the Board may set the 3    matter for hearing. If the matter is set for hearing, the 4    Board shall send the law enforcement officer the notice of 5    the date, time and location of the hearing. If the law 6    enforcement officer or counsel for the officer does 7    appear, at the Board's discretion, the hearing may proceed 8    or may be continued to a date and time agreed upon by all 9    parties. If on the date of the hearing, neither the law 10    enforcement officer nor counsel for the officer appears, 11    the Board may proceed with the hearing for default in 12    their absence. 13        (3) If the law enforcement officer fails to comply 14    with paragraph (2), all of the allegations contained in 15    the complaint shall be deemed admitted and the law 16    enforcement officer shall be decertified if, by a majority 17    vote of the Panel panel, the conduct charged in the 18    complaint is found to constitute sufficient grounds for 19    decertification under this Act. Notice of the 20    decertification decision may be served by personal 21    delivery, by mail, or, at the discretion of the Board, by 22    electronic means as adopted by rule to the address or 23    email address specified by the law enforcement officer in 24    the officer's last communication with the Board. Notice 25    shall also be provided to the law enforcement officer's 26    employing law enforcement agency.  HB3641- 41 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (4) The Board, at the request of the law enforcement 2    officer subject to the Formal Complaint, may suspend a 3    hearing on a Formal Complaint for no more than one year if 4    a concurrent criminal matter is pending. If the law 5    enforcement officer requests to have the hearing 6    suspended, the law enforcement officer's certification 7    shall be deemed inactive until the law enforcement 8    officer's Formal Complaint hearing concludes. The Board or 9    the law enforcement officer may request to have the 10    hearing suspended for up to 6 additional months for good 11    cause. This request may be renewed. For purposes of this 12    paragraph (4), "good cause" means an incident or 13    occurrence that is beyond the control of the requester and 14    that prevents the hearing from occurring, or holding the 15    hearing would impose an undue hardship or prejudice on the 16    requester. 17        (5) Surrender of certification or waiver. Upon the 18    Board's issuance of a complaint, and prior to hearing on 19    the matter, a law enforcement officer may choose to 20    surrender the officer's certification or waiver by 21    notifying the Board in writing of the officer's decision 22    to do so. Upon receipt of such notification from the law 23    enforcement officer, the Board shall immediately decertify 24    the officer, or revoke any waiver previously granted. In 25    the case of a surrender of certification or waiver, the 26    Board's proceeding shall terminate.  HB3641- 42 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (6) Appointment of administrative law judges. The 2    Board shall retain any attorney licensed to practice law 3    in the State of Illinois to serve as an administrative law 4    judge in any action involving a law enforcement officer 5    under this Act. The administrative law judge shall be 6    retained to a term of no greater than 4 years. If more than 7    one judge is retained, the terms shall be staggered. The 8    administrative law judge has full authority to conduct the 9    hearings.10        Administrative law judges will receive initial and 11    annual training that is adequate in quality, quantity, 12    scope, and type, and will cover, at minimum the following 13    topics:14            (i) constitutional and other relevant law on 15        police-community encounters, including the law on the 16        use of force and stops, searches, and arrests;17            (ii) police tactics;18            (iii) investigations of police conduct;19            (iv) impartial policing;20            (v) policing individuals in crisis;21            (vi) Illinois police policies, procedures, and 22        disciplinary rules;23            (vii) procedural justice; and24            (viii) community outreach.25        The Board shall determine the content and extent of 26    the training within the scope provided for by this   HB3641- 43 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    subsection. 2        (7) Hearing. At the hearing, the administrative law 3    judge will hear the allegations alleged in the complaint. 4    The law enforcement officer or , the counsel for of the 5    officer officer's choosing, and the Statewide Enforcement 6    Unit Board, or the officer's counsel, shall be afforded 7    the opportunity to present any pertinent statements, 8    testimony, evidence, and arguments. The law enforcement 9    officer shall be afforded the opportunity to request that 10    the Board compel the attendance of witnesses and 11    production of related documents. After the conclusion of 12    the hearing, the administrative law judge shall report any 13    findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended 14    disposition to the Panel. If the law enforcement officer 15    objects to any procedural or substantive legal portion of 16    the report, the officer may do so by written brief filed 17    with the Panel within 14 days after receipt of the report. 18    The Panel may grant reasonable extensions for good cause 19    shown or when mutually agreed upon by the parties. 20        No later than 28 days before the hearing, the law 21    enforcement officer or the law enforcement officer's 22    counsel a party shall disclose the following to the Board:23            (i) The name and, if known, the address and 24        telephone number of each individual likely to have 25        information relevant to the hearing that the law 26        enforcement officer disclosing party may use to   HB3641- 44 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        support its claims or defenses. This includes, but is 2        not limited to, any name that has previously been held 3        as confidential by the Board.4            (ii) A copy of any documents and videos that are in 5        the possession, custody, or control of the law 6        enforcement officer party, and that the law 7        enforcement officer disclosing party may use to 8        support its claims or defenses. 9            No later than 28 days after the filing of a formal 10        complaint, the Statewide Enforcement Unit shall give 11        to the law enforcement officer or their counsel a copy 12        of the complete and unredacted "investigation file" as 13        defined in paragraph (f) of subsection (f) including, 14        but not limited to, any name that has previously been 15        held as confidential by the Statewide Enforcement Unit 16        or Board.17        (8) Certification Review Meeting. Upon receipt of the 18    administrative law judge's findings of fact, conclusions 19    of law, and recommended disposition, and any submitted 20    objections from the law enforcement officer, the Panel 21    shall call for a certification review meeting.22        In such a meeting, the Panel may adjourn into a closed 23    conference for the purposes of deliberating on the 24    evidence presented during the hearing. In closed 25    conference, the Panel shall consider the hearing officer's 26    findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommended   HB3641- 45 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    disposition and may deliberate on all evidence and 2    testimony received and may consider the weight and 3    credibility to be given to the evidence received. No new 4    or additional evidence may be presented to the Panel. 5    After concluding its deliberations, the Panel shall 6    convene in open session for its consideration of the 7    matter. If a simple majority of the Panel finds that no 8    allegations in the complaint supporting one or more 9    charges of misconduct are proven by clear and convincing 10    evidence, then the Panel shall recommend to the Board that 11    the complaint be dismissed. If a simple majority of the 12    Panel finds that the allegations in the complaint 13    supporting one or more charges of misconduct are proven by 14    clear and convincing evidence, then the Panel shall 15    recommend to the Board to decertify the officer. The Panel 16    shall prepare a summary report as soon as practicable 17    after the completion of the meeting including the 18    following: the hearing officer's findings of fact, 19    conclusions of law, recommended disposition, and the 20    Panel's order.21        (9) Final action by the Board. After receiving the 22    Panel's recommendations and any objections by the law 23    enforcement officer, and after due consideration of the 24    Panel's recommendations, the Board, by majority vote, 25    shall issue a final decision to decertify the law 26    enforcement officer or take no action in regard to the law   HB3641- 46 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    enforcement officer. No new or additional evidence may be 2    presented to the Board. If the Board makes a final 3    decision contrary to the recommendations of the Panel, the 4    Board shall set forth in its final written decision the 5    specific written reasons for not following the Panel's 6    recommendations. A copy of the Board's final decision 7    shall be served upon the law enforcement officer by the 8    Board, either personally or as provided in this Act for 9    the service of a notice of hearing. A copy of the Board's 10    final decision also shall be delivered to the last 11    employing law enforcement agency, the complainant, and the 12    Panel.13        (10) Reconsideration of the Board's Decision. Within 14    30 days after service of the Board's final decision, the 15    Panel or the law enforcement officer may file a written 16    motion for reconsideration with the Review Committee. The 17    motion for reconsideration shall specify the particular 18    grounds for reconsideration. The non-moving party may 19    respond to the motion for reconsideration. The Review 20    Committee shall only address the issues raised by the 21    parties. 22        The Review Committee may deny the motion for 23    reconsideration, or it may grant the motion in whole or in 24    part and issue a new final decision in the matter. The 25    Review Committee must notify the law enforcement officer 26    and their last employing law enforcement agency within 14   HB3641- 47 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    days of a denial and state the reasons for denial.2    (i) This Section applies to conduct by a full-time or 3part-time law enforcement officer in violation of subsection 4(b) that occurred before, on, or after the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly.6    (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 7the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 8102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 91, 2022.10    (k) Annual report. The Board shall submit an annual report 11to the Governor, Attorney General, President and Minority 12Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority Leader of 13the House of Representatives on or before March 1, 2026, and 14every year thereafter indicating:15        (1) the number of complaints under this Section 16    received in the preceding calendar year, including but not 17    limited to the race, gender, and type of discretionary 18    decertification complaints received;19        (2) the number of investigations initiated in the 20    preceding calendar year since the date of the last report;21        (3) the number of investigations concluded in the 22    preceding calendar year;23        (4) the number of investigations pending as of the 24    last date of the preceding calendar year;25        (5) the number of hearings held in the preceding 26    calendar year;  HB3641- 48 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (6) the number of officers decertified in the 2    preceding calendar year;3        (7) the number of officers where insufficient cause 4    for decertification was found by an investigator 5    conducting an investigation under this Section; and6        (8) the number of officers where insufficient cause 7    for decertification was found by an administrative law 8    judge, review panel, or Board.9    The annual report shall be publicly available on the 10website of the Board. 11(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 12    (50 ILCS 705/6.4 new)13    Sec. 6.4. Denials and Certain Appeals14    (a) The Board shall issue a formal written notice of the 15denial of training waiver, denial of initial certification or 16the intent to decertify under Section 6.1 within 15 days of the 17decision. The Board shall set forth the specific reasons for 18the waiver denial, denial of initial certification or 19automatic decertification and serve the officer, personally, 20by e-mail, or by certified mail. The Board shall also inform 21the law enforcement officer of the ability to appeal the 22decision in writing or by a hearing.23        (1) A law enforcement officer whose application for a 24    training waiver is denied by the Board, who is denied 25    initial certification, or who is notified of the intent to   HB3641- 49 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    decertify under Section 6.1, may submit an appeal that 2    shall include the particular reasons why the law 3    enforcement officer believes that the decision to deny the 4    waiver, certification, or decertify pursuant to Section 5    6.1 was incorrect and all relevant document the law 6    enforcement officer believes supports the appeal, within 7    10 days after service of the notice of the denial. The 8    officer may request a summary hearing in front of the 9    Board where limited testimony may be offered to provide 10    evidence not available via documentary evidence.11    (b) When a Notice of Non-Compliance has been sent under 12Section 6.2, the law enforcement agency may request to 13schedule the matter for an informal conference at which the 14law enforcement agency will meet with the Board in an attempt 15to resolve the matter.16    A request by the law enforcement agency for an informal 17conference must be received by the Board within 15 days after 18the receipt of the Notice of Non-Compliance. Should a 19resolution not be reached, the matter shall be set for 20hearing.21    (c) The Board may create a committee to hear and decide the 22appeals under this Section. 23    (50 ILCS 705/8.1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 508.1)24    Sec. 8.1. Full-time law enforcement and county corrections 25officers.   HB3641- 50 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    (a) The Board shall establish minimum certification 2standards for all officers that shall include: No person shall 3receive a permanent appointment as a law enforcement officer 4or a permanent appointment as a county corrections officer 5unless that person has been awarded, within 6 months of the 6officer's initial full-time employment, a certificate 7attesting to the officer's successful completion of the 8Minimum Standards Basic Law Enforcement or County Correctional 9Training Course as prescribed by the Board to be completed 10within 6 months of the applicant's initial full-time 11employment; or has been awarded a certificate attesting to the 12applicant's officer's satisfactory completion of a training 13program of similar content and number of hours and which 14course has been found acceptable by the Board under the 15provisions of this Act. ; or The Board shall grant a training 16waiver by reason of prior law enforcement or county 17corrections experience, obtained in Illinois, in any other 18state, or with an agency of the federal government, where the 19basic training requirement is determined by the Board to be 20sufficient illogical and unreasonable. Agencies seeking a 21reciprocity waiver for training completed outside of Illinois 22must conduct a thorough background check and provide 23verification of the officer's prior training. After review and 24satisfaction of all requested conditions related to training, 25the officer shall be awarded an equivalency waiver certificate 26satisfying the training requirements of this Section. Within   HB3641- 51 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b160 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2103rd General Assembly, the Board shall adopt uniform rules 3providing for a training waiver process for a person 4previously employed and qualified as a law enforcement or 5county corrections officer under federal law or the laws of 6any other state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement 7officer or correctional officer academy who would be qualified 8to be employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional 9officer by the federal government or any other state. These 10rules shall address the process for evaluating prior training 11credit, a description and list of the courses typically 12required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 13taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 14pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training 15waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 16previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 17officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall 18successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 19training waiver:20        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved 21    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the 22    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 23    county correctional officers;24        (2) firearms training; and25        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 26    certification examination.   HB3641- 52 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    If such training is required and not completed within the 2applicable 6 months, then the officer must forfeit the 3officer's position, or the employing agency must obtain a 4waiver from the Board extending the period for compliance. 5Such training waiver shall be issued only for good and 6justifiable reasons, and in no case shall extend more than 90 7days beyond the initial 6 months. Any hiring agency that fails 8to train a law enforcement officer within this period shall be 9prohibited from employing this individual in a law enforcement 10capacity for one year from the date training was to be 11completed. If an agency again fails to train the individual a 12second time, the agency shall be permanently barred from 13employing this individual in a law enforcement capacity.14    If the Board declines to grant a training waiver, the 15Board must mail the refusal to the applicant and their 16supporting law enforcement agency by both certified and 17regular mail at the last known address of record. The 18notification shall include a statement of determination, 19reasons for denial, and the applicant's and law enforcement 20agency's rights to contest and appeal under Section 6.4. 21Should the applicant or law enforcement agency not appeal 22within the time period specified in Section 6.4, the Board may 23deem the law enforcement officer's waiver denied.24        (4) successful completion of a background 25    investigation including:26            (A) a state and national background check,   HB3641- 53 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        including, but not limited to, a full employment 2        history; provided, that if the applicant has been 3        previously employed in law enforcement in any state or 4        United States territory or by the federal government, 5        the applicant's full employment record, including 6        complaints, discipline, and rejected applications, 7        shall be evaluated in the background check. The 8        background check shall be conducted under the 9        procedures established by the Board and include a 10        criminal background records check in accordance with 11        the Prison Rape Elimination Act (PREA), 28 C.F.R. 12        115.317, the National Decertification Index, the 13        National Crime Information Center database, and the 14        Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS).15            (B) a social media search of the applicant. This 16        search shall include, but is not limited to, the 17        following, whether the applicant has:18                (i) Made statements, posts, shared posts, or 19            comments in support of, or that demonstrates, 20            espouses, advocates, or supports public expression 21            of lawlessness or bias or discrimination. The 22            Board shall preserve a copy of any posts, shared 23            posts, or comments in support of anything 24            violative of this Section the investigation files 25            as evidence of unsuitability; or26                (ii) Outwardly facing social media activity   HB3641- 54 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1            that would otherwise undermine public confidence 2            in law enforcement or in the applicant's ability 3            to carry out the public safety mission in a legal, 4            constitutional, unbiased, and non-discriminatory 5            fashion. The Board shall preserve a copy of any 6            posts, shared posts, or comments in support of 7            anything violative of this Section the 8            investigation files as evidence of certification 9            unsuitability; and10                (iii) A check of the applicant's lack of 11            participation with any foreign terrorist 12            organization, domestic terrorist group, criminal 13            organization, hate group, or a group that 14            advocates for, espouses, or promotes the 15            commission of acts of force and violence, or any 16            other unlawful means, to overthrow a local, state, 17            or Federal government of the United States.18                This search shall not include, and the Board 19            may not consider, posts that contain 20            characteristics of age, race, religion, 21            disability, or sex of the applicant.22            (C) That the applicant has not been convicted of, 23        found guilty of, entered a plea of guilty to, or 24        entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony offense, 25        any of the misdemeanors in Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 26        11-6.5, 11-6.6, 11-9.1, 11-9.1B, 11-14, 11-14.1,   HB3641- 55 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        11-30, 12-2, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 16-1, 17-1, 17-2, 2        26.5-1, 26.5-2, 26.5-3, 28-3, 29-1, any misdemeanor in 3        violation of any Section of Part E of Title III of the 4        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 5        subsection (a) of Section 17-32 of the Criminal Code 6        of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 5 or 7        5.2 of the Cannabis Control Act, or a crime involving 8        moral turpitude under the laws of this State or any 9        other state which if committed in this State would be 10        punishable as a felony or a crime of moral turpitude, 11        or any felony or misdemeanor in violation of federal 12        law or the law of any state that is the equivalent of 13        any of the offenses specified therein.14                (i) The Board may deny certification to a 15            person who received a sentence of supervision, 16            conditional discharge, or first offender 17            probation, or any similar disposition provided for 18            by law for a violation under 6.1. The Board shall 19            review shall consider any evidence of 20            rehabilitation and mitigating factors contained in 21            the person's record, including any of the 22            following factors and evidence, to determine if 23            the violation will impair the ability of the law 24            enforcement officer:25                    (I) the lack of direct relation of the 26                offense for which the person was previously   HB3641- 56 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1                convicted to the duties, functions, and 2                responsibilities of the law enforcement 3                officer;4                    (II) the age of the applicant at the time 5                of the criminal offense;6                    (III) successful completion of sentence;7                    (IV) evidence of the applicant's present 8                fitness and professional character;9                    (V) evidence of rehabilitation or 10                rehabilitative effort during or a term 11                conditional discharge, or first offender 12                probation, or any similar disposition provided 13                for by law; and14                    (VI) any other mitigating factors that 15                contribute to the person's potential and 16                current ability to perform as a law 17                enforcement officer.18    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose 19certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 20enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 21enforcement officer by an employing agency, or be authorized 22to carry firearms under the authority of the employer, except 23as otherwise authorized to carry a firearm under State or 24federal law. Sheriffs who are elected as of January 1, 2022 25(the effective date of Public Act 101-652) are exempt from the 26requirement of certified status. Failure to be certified in   HB3641- 57 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1accordance with this Act shall cause the officer to forfeit 2the officer's position.3    An employing agency may not grant a person status as a law 4enforcement officer unless the person has been granted an 5active law enforcement officer certification by the Board.6    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 7enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 8authority.9        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 10    inactive 60 days after upon termination, resignation, 11    retirement, or separation from the officer's employing law 12    enforcement agency for any reason. The Board shall 13    re-activate a certification upon written application from 14    the law enforcement officer's law enforcement agency that 15    shows the law enforcement officer: (i) has accepted a 16    full-time law enforcement position with that law 17    enforcement agency, and (ii) is not the subject of a 18    decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets all other 19    criteria for re-activation required by the Board. The 20    Board may also establish special training requirements to 21    be completed as a condition for re-activation.22        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 23    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30 24    days. The Board may extend this review for no more than 25    additional 60 days if there is missing or incomplete 26    information about the law enforcement officer available to   HB3641- 58 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    the Board sufficient to make a decision. The reason for 2    this extension must be documented. A law enforcement 3    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a full-time law 4    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 5    reactivation waiver is under review. 6        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 7    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 8    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 9    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 10    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.11        If the Board seeks to deny reactivation to a law 12    enforcement officer due to issues unrelated to training or 13    employment, it must proceed to discretionary 14    decertification under Section 6.3. 15        The Board may refuse to re-activate the certification 16    of a law enforcement officer who was involuntarily 17    terminated for good cause by an employing agency for 18    conduct subject to decertification under this Act or 19    resigned or retired after receiving notice of a law 20    enforcement agency's investigation.21        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 22    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 23    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 24    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 25    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 26    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating   HB3641- 59 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 2    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 3    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 4    submitted to the Board with a copy to the chief 5    administrator of the law enforcement officer's current or 6    new employing agency.7        (3) Certification that has become inactive under 8    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) shall be reactivated 9    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's 10    agency upon a showing that the law enforcement officer: 11    (i) is employed in a full-time law enforcement position 12    with the same law enforcement agency, and (ii) is not the 13    subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) meets 14    all other criteria for re-activation required by the 15    Board.16        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this subsection 17    (b), a law enforcement officer whose certification has 18    become inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 19    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 20    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by 21    any verifying documentation. A grant of a waiver is within 22    the discretion of the Board. Within 7 days of receiving a 23    request for a waiver under this Section, the Board shall 24    notify the law enforcement officer and the chief 25    administrator of the law enforcement officer's employing 26    agency, whether the request has been granted, denied, or   HB3641- 60 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    if the Board will take additional time for information. If 2    a A law enforcement agency whose request for a waiver 3    under this subsection is denied the law enforcement 4    officer, law enforcement agency, or both the law 5    enforcement officer and the law enforcement agency are is 6    entitled to request a review of the denial by the Board. 7    The law enforcement agency must request a review within 20 8    days of the waiver being denied. The burden of proof shall 9    be on the law enforcement agency or law enforcement 10    officer to show why the law enforcement officer is 11    entitled to a waiver of the legislatively required 12    training and eligibility requirements. 13    (c) No provision of this Section shall be construed to 14mean that a county corrections officer employed by a 15governmental agency at the time of the effective date of this 16amendatory Act, either as a probationary county corrections 17officer or as a permanent county corrections officer, shall 18require certification under the provisions of this Section. No 19provision of this Section shall be construed to apply to 20certification of elected county sheriffs.21    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 22to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 23employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or 24charges against the officer alleging that the officer 25committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 26Act.  HB3641- 61 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 2completion of the training requirements required in this Act 3in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.4    (e-1) Each employing law enforcement agency shall allow 5and provide an opportunity for a law enforcement officer to 6complete the mandated requirements in this Act. All mandated 7training shall be provided at no cost to the employees. 8Employees shall be paid for all time spent attending mandated 9training. 10    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 11maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 12legislatively required training in a format designated by the 13Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 14within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 15the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 16Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 17Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 18records of the law enforcement officer. 19    (f) This Section does not apply to part-time law 20enforcement officers or probationary part-time law enforcement 21officers.22    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 23the changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-652, Public 24Act 102-28, and Public Act 102-694 take effect July 1, 2022.25    (h) An individual who is not certified by the Board or 26whose certified status is inactive shall not function as a law   HB3641- 62 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 2enforcement officer by an employing law enforcement agency, or 3be authorized to carry firearms under the authority of the 4employer, except as otherwise authorized to carry a firearm 5under State or federal law. Sheriffs who are elected as of 6January 1, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 101-652) are 7exempt from the requirement of certified status. Failure to be 8certified in accordance with this Act shall cause the officer 9to forfeit the officer's position.10    An employing law enforcement agency may not grant a person 11status as a law enforcement officer unless the person has been 12granted an active law enforcement officer certification by the 13Board.14    No provision of this Section shall be construed to mean 15that a county corrections officer employed by a governmental 16agency at the time of the effective date of this amendatory 17Act, either as a probationary county corrections officer or as 18a permanent county corrections officer, shall require 19certification under the provisions of this Section. No 20provision of this Section shall be construed to apply to 21certification of elected county sheriffs who are elected as of 22January 1, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 101-652.) 23(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 24103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-389, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    (50 ILCS 705/8.2)  HB3641- 63 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    Sec. 8.2. Part-time law enforcement officers. 2    (a) A person hired to serve as a part-time law enforcement 3officer must obtain from the Board a certificate (i) attesting 4to the officer's: (i) successful completion of the part-time 5police training course or ; (ii) attesting to the officer's 6satisfactory completion of a training program of similar 7content and number of hours that has been found acceptable by 8the Board under the provisions of this Act; or (iii) a training 9waiver attesting to the Board's determination that the 10part-time police training course is unnecessary because of the 11person's prior law enforcement experience obtained in 12Illinois, in any other state, or with an agency of the federal 13government: (ii) successful completion of a background 14investigation as dictated by Section 8.1(a)(2)(a)-(c).. A 15person hired on or after March 14, 2002 (the effective date of 16Public Act 92-533) this amendatory Act of the 92nd General 17Assembly must obtain this certificate within 18 months after 18the initial date of hire as a probationary part-time law 19enforcement officer in the State of Illinois. The probationary 20part-time law enforcement officer must be enrolled and 21accepted into a Board-approved course within 6 months after 22active employment by any department in the State. A person 23hired on or after January 1, 1996 and before March 14, 2002 24(the effective date of Public Act 92-533) this amendatory Act 25of the 92nd General Assembly must obtain this certificate 26within 18 months after the date of hire. A person hired before   HB3641- 64 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1January 1, 1996 must obtain this certificate within 24 months 2after January 1, 1996 (the effective date of Public Act 389-170) this amendatory Act of 1995. Agencies seeking a 4reciprocity waiver for training completed outside of Illinois 5must conduct a thorough background check and provide 6verification of the officer's prior training. After review and 7satisfaction of all requested conditions, the officer shall be 8awarded an equivalency certificate satisfying the requirements 9of this Section. Within 60 days after January 1, 2024 (the 10effective date of Public Act 103-389) this amendatory Act of 11the 103rd General Assembly, the Board shall adopt uniform 12rules providing for a waiver process for a person previously 13employed and qualified as a law enforcement or county 14corrections officer under federal law or the laws of any other 15state, or who has completed a basic law enforcement officer or 16correctional officer academy who would be qualified to be 17employed as a law enforcement officer or correctional officer 18by the federal government or any other state. These rules 19shall address the process for evaluating prior training 20credit, a description and list of the courses typically 21required for reciprocity candidates to complete prior to 22taking the exam, and a procedure for employers seeking a 23pre-activation determination for a reciprocity training 24waiver. The rules shall provide that any eligible person 25previously trained as a law enforcement or county corrections 26officer under federal law or the laws of any other state shall   HB3641- 65 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1successfully complete the following prior to the approval of a 2waiver:3        (1) a training program or set of coursework approved 4    by the Board on the laws of this State relevant to the 5    duties and training requirements of law enforcement and 6    county correctional officers;7        (2) firearms training; and8        (3) successful passage of the equivalency 9    certification examination. 10    The employing agency may seek an extension waiver from the 11Board extending the period for compliance. An extension waiver 12shall be issued only for good and justifiable reasons, and the 13probationary part-time law enforcement officer may not 14practice as a part-time law enforcement officer during the 15extension waiver period. If training is required and not 16completed within the applicable time period, as extended by 17any waiver that may be granted, then the officer must forfeit 18the officer's position.19    An individual who is not certified by the Board or whose 20certified status is inactive shall not function as a law 21enforcement officer, be assigned the duties of a law 22enforcement officer by an agency, or be authorized to carry 23firearms under the authority of the employer, except that 24sheriffs who are elected are exempt from the requirement of 25certified status. Failure to be in accordance with this Act 26shall cause the officer to forfeit the officer's position.  HB3641- 66 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    If the Board declines to grant a training waiver, the 2Board must mail the refusal to the applicant and their 3supporting law enforcement agency by both certified and 4regular mail at the last known address of record. The 5notification shall include a statement of determination, 6reasons for denial, and the applicant's and law enforcement 7agency's rights to contest and appeal under Section 6.4. 8Should the applicant or law enforcement agency not appeal 9within the time period specified in Section 6.4, the Board may 10deem the law enforcement officer's waiver denied. 11    (a-5) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 12shall be allowed to complete 6 six months of a part-time police 13training course and function as a law enforcement officer as 14permitted by this subsection with a waiver from the Board, 15provided the part-time law enforcement officer is still 16enrolled in the training course. If the part-time probationary 17law enforcement officer withdraws from the course for any 18reason or does not complete the course within the applicable 19time period, as extended by any waiver that may be granted, 20then the officer must forfeit the officer's position. A 21probationary law enforcement officer must function under the 22following rules: 23        (1) A law enforcement agency may not grant a person 24    status as a law enforcement officer unless the person has 25    been granted an active law enforcement officer 26    certification by the Board.   HB3641- 67 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (2) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 2    shall not be used as a permanent replacement for a 3    full-time law enforcement officer.4        (3) A part-time probationary law enforcement officer 5    shall be directly supervised at all times by a 6    Board-certified Board certified law enforcement officer. 7    Direct supervision requires oversight and control with the 8    supervisor having final decision-making authority as to 9    the actions of the recruit during duty hours. 10    (b) Inactive status. A person who has an inactive law 11enforcement officer certification has no law enforcement 12authority.13        (1) A law enforcement officer's certification becomes 14    inactive 60 days after upon termination, resignation, 15    retirement, or separation from the employing agency for 16    any reason. The Board shall reactivate re-activate a 17    certification upon written application from the law 18    enforcement officer's employing agency that shows the law 19    enforcement officer: (i) has accepted a part-time law 20    enforcement position with that a law enforcement agency, 21    and (ii) is not the subject of a decertification 22    proceeding, and (iii) meets all other criteria for 23    re-activation required by the Board.24        If the Board seeks to deny reactivation to a law 25    enforcement officer due to issues unrelated to training or 26    employment, it must proceed to discretionary   HB3641- 68 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    decertification under Section 6.3. 2        The Board may refuse to re-activate the certification 3    of a law enforcement officer who was involuntarily 4    terminated for good cause by the officer's employing 5    agency for conduct subject to decertification under this 6    Act or resigned or retired after receiving notice of a law 7    enforcement agency's investigation.8        (2) A law enforcement agency may place an officer who 9    is currently certified on inactive status by sending a 10    written request to the Board. A law enforcement officer 11    whose certificate has been placed on inactive status shall 12    not function as a law enforcement officer until the 13    officer has completed any requirements for reactivating 14    the certificate as required by the Board. A request for 15    inactive status in this subsection shall be in writing, 16    accompanied by verifying documentation, and shall be 17    submitted to the Board by the law enforcement officer's 18    employing agency.19        (3) Certification that has become inactive under 20    paragraph (2) of this subsection (b), shall be reactivated 21    by written notice from the law enforcement officer's law 22    enforcement agency upon a showing that the law enforcement 23    officer is: (i) employed in a part-time law enforcement 24    position with the same law enforcement agency, and (ii) 25    not the subject of a decertification proceeding, and (iii) 26    meets all other criteria for re-activation required by the   HB3641- 69 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    Board. The Board may also establish special training 2    requirements to be completed as a condition for 3    reactivation re-activation. 4        The Board shall review a notice for reactivation from 5    a law enforcement agency and provide a response within 30 6    days. The Board may extend this review. A law enforcement 7    officer shall be allowed to be employed as a part-time law 8    enforcement officer while the law enforcement officer 9    reactivation waiver is under review. 10        A law enforcement officer who is refused reactivation 11    or an employing agency of a law enforcement officer who is 12    refused reactivation under this Section may request a 13    hearing in accordance with the hearing procedures as 14    outlined in subsection (h) of Section 6.3 of this Act.15        (4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of this Section, a 16    law enforcement officer whose certification has become 17    inactive under paragraph (2) may have the officer's 18    employing agency submit a request for a waiver of training 19    requirements to the Board in writing and accompanied by 20    any verifying documentation. A grant of a waiver is within 21    the discretion of the Board. Within 7 days of receiving a 22    request for a waiver under this Section section, the Board 23    shall notify the law enforcement officer and the chief 24    administrator of the law enforcement officer's employing 25    agency, whether the request has been granted, denied, or 26    if the Board will take additional time for information. If   HB3641- 70 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    a A law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer, 2    whose request for a waiver under this subsection is 3    denied, the law enforcement officer and/or law enforcement 4    agency is entitled to request a review of the denial by the 5    Board. The law enforcement agency must request a review 6    within 20 days after the waiver being denied. The burden 7    of proof shall be on the law enforcement agency or law 8    enforcement officer to show why the law enforcement 9    officer is entitled to a waiver of the legislatively 10    required training and eligibility requirements. 11    (c) The part-time police training course referred to in 12this Section shall be of similar content and the same number of 13hours as the courses for full-time officers and shall be 14provided by Mobile Team In-Service Training Units under the 15Intergovernmental Law Enforcement Officer's In-Service 16Training Act or by another approved program or facility in a 17manner prescribed by the Board.18    (d) Within 14 days, a law enforcement officer shall report 19to the Board: (1) any name change; (2) any change in 20employment; or (3) the filing of any criminal indictment or 21charges against the officer alleging that the officer 22committed any offense as enumerated in Section 6.1 of this 23Act.24    (e) All law enforcement officers must report the 25completion of the training requirements required in this Act 26in compliance with Section 8.4 of this Act.  HB3641- 71 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    (e-1) Each employing agency shall allow and provide an 2opportunity for a law enforcement officer to complete the 3requirements in this Act. All mandated training shall be 4provided for at no cost to the employees. Employees shall be 5paid for all time spent attending mandated training. 6    (e-2) Each agency, academy, or training provider shall 7maintain proof of a law enforcement officer's completion of 8legislatively required training in a format designated by the 9Board. The report of training shall be submitted to the Board 10within 30 days following completion of the training. A copy of 11the report shall be submitted to the law enforcement officer. 12Upon receipt of a properly completed report of training, the 13Board will make the appropriate entry into the training 14records of the law enforcement officer. 15    (f) For the purposes of this Section, the Board shall 16adopt rules defining what constitutes employment on a 17part-time basis.18    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 19the changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-694 this 20amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly and Public Act 21101-652 take effect July 1, 2022. 22(Source: P.A. 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 103-389, eff. 1-1-24; 23revised 7-29-24.) 24    (50 ILCS 705/8.3)25    Sec. 8.3. Emergency order of suspension.  HB3641- 72 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    (a) The Board, upon being notified that a law enforcement 2officer has been arrested or indicted on any felony charge or 3charges, may immediately suspend the law enforcement officer's 4certification for a term specified by the Board to begin no 5sooner than the date of the violation. The Board shall also 6notify the chief administrator of any law enforcement agency 7currently employing the officer. The Board shall have 8authority to dissolve an emergency order of suspension at any 9time for any reason.10    (a-5) The Board may consider the following factors in 11determining the term of a suspension:12        (1) the seriousness of the conduct resulting in the 13    arrest;14        (2) whether the offense contains an element of actual 15    or threatened bodily injury or coerce against another 16    person;17        (3) the law enforcement officer's previous arrests;18        (4) the law enforcement officer's previous 19    certification suspensions;20        (5) actual or potential harm to public safety; and21        (6) rebuttal evidence regarding mitigating factors. 22    (b) Notice of the immediate suspension shall be served on 23the law enforcement officer, the employing agency, the chief 24executive of the employing agency, and state the reason for 25suspension within seven days.26    (c) Upon service of the notice, the law enforcement   HB3641- 73 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1officer's employing agency shall have 30 days to request to be 2heard by the Panel. The hearing, if requested by the officer, 3shall follow the hearing procedures as outlined in subsection 4(h) of Section 6.4 6.3 of this Act. In the hearing, the written 5communication and any other evidence obtained therewith may be 6introduced as evidence against the law enforcement officer; 7provided however, the law enforcement officer, or their 8counsel, shall have the opportunity to discredit, impeach and 9submit evidence rebutting such evidence to explain why the 10officer's certification should not be suspended or why the 11suspension should be shortened. The law enforcement officer 12may also present any rebuttal evidence of mitigating factors. 13    (d) The Panel shall review the recommendation from the 14administrative law judge regarding the suspension, and if the 15Panel finds that the proof is evident or the presumption great 16that the officer has committed the offense charged, the Panel 17can sustain or reduce the length of the suspension. If the 18Panel does not find that the proof is evident or the 19presumption great that the officer has committed the offense 20charged, the Panel can reverse the suspension.21    If the law enforcement officer does not request to be 22heard or does not appear, the Panel may hold the hearing in the 23officer's absence. The law enforcement officer and the 24employing agency shall be notified of the decision of the 25Panel within 7 days. The law enforcement officer may request 26to suspend the hearing until after the officer's criminal   HB3641- 74 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1trial has occurred, however the suspension will remain intact 2until the hearing.3    (e) Findings and conclusions made in hearing for an 4emergency suspension shall not be binding on any party in any 5subsequent proceeding under this Act.6    (f) A Panel member acting in good faith, and not in a 7willful and wanton manner, in accordance with this Section, 8shall not, as a result of such actions, be subject to criminal 9prosecution or civil damages, including but not limited to 10lost wages.11    (g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 12the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 13102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 141, 2022. 15(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 16    (50 ILCS 705/9.2)17    Sec. 9.2. Officer professional conduct database; 18transparency.19    (a) (blank). All law enforcement agencies and the Illinois 20State Police shall notify the Board of any final determination 21of a willful violation of department, agency, or the Illinois 22State Police policy, official misconduct, or violation of law 23within 10 days when:24        (1) the determination leads to a suspension of at 25    least 10 days;  HB3641- 75 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1        (2) any infraction that would trigger an official or 2    formal investigation under a law enforcement agency or the 3    Illinois State Police policy;4        (3) there is an allegation of misconduct or regarding 5    truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or integrity; or6        (4) the officer resigns or retires during the course 7    of an investigation and the officer has been served notice 8    that the officer is under investigation.9    Agencies and the Illinois State Police may report to the 10Board any conduct they deem appropriate to disseminate to 11another law enforcement agency regarding a law enforcement 12officer.13    The agency or the Illinois State Police shall report to 14the Board within 10 days of a final determination and final 15exhaustion of any administrative appeal, or the law 16enforcement officer's resignation or retirement, and shall 17provide information regarding the nature of the violation. 18This notification shall not necessarily trigger certification 19review.20    A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State Police 21shall be immune from liability for a disclosure made as 22described in this subsection, unless the disclosure would 23constitute intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence.24    (b) (blank). Within 14 days after receiving notification 25from a law enforcement agency or the Illinois State Police, 26the Board must notify the law enforcement officer of the   HB3641- 76 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1report and the officer's right to provide a statement 2regarding the reported violation. The law enforcement officer 3shall have 14 days from receiving notice to provide a written 4objection contesting information included in the agency's 5report. The objection must be filed with the Board on a form 6prescribed by the Board and a copy must be served on the law 7enforcement agency. The objection shall remain in the database 8with the reported violation. 9    (c) The Board shall maintain a database readily available 10to any chief administrative officer, or the officer's 11designee, of a law enforcement agency and the Illinois State 12Police that shall show for each law enforcement officer: (i) 13dates of certification, decertification, and inactive status; 14(ii) each sustained instance of departmental misconduct that 15lead to a suspension at least 10 days or any infraction that 16would trigger an official or formal investigation under the 17law enforcement agency policy, any allegation of misconduct 18regarding truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or 19integrity, or any other reported violation, the nature of the 20violation, the reason for the final decision of discharge or 21dismissal, and any statement provided by the officer; (iii) 22date of separation from employment from any local or state law 23enforcement agency; (iv) the reason for separation from 24employment, including, but not limited to: whether the 25separation was based on misconduct or occurred while the law 26enforcement agency was conducting an investigation of the   HB3641- 77 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1certified individual for a violation of an employing agency's 2rules, policy or procedure or other misconduct or improper 3action.4        (1) This database shall also be accessible to the 5    State's Attorney of any county in this State and the 6    Attorney General for the purpose of complying with 7    obligations under Brady v. Maryland (373 U.S. 83) or 8    Giglio v. United States (405 U.S. 150). This database 9    shall also be accessible to the chief administrative 10    officer of any law enforcement agency for the purposes of 11    hiring law enforcement officers. This database shall not 12    be accessible to anyone not listed in this subsection.13        (2) (Blank). Before a law enforcement agency may 14    appoint a law enforcement officer or a person seeking a 15    certification as a law enforcement officer in this State, 16    the chief administrative officer or designee must check 17    the Officer Professional Conduct Database, contact each 18    person's previous law enforcement employers, and document 19    the contact. This documentation must be available for 20    review by the Board for a minimum of five years after the 21    law enforcement officer's termination, retirement, 22    resignation or separation with that agency.23         (3) The database, documents, materials, or other 24    information in the possession or control of the Board that 25    are obtained by or disclosed to the Board under this 26    subsection shall be confidential by law and privileged,   HB3641- 78 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1    shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject 2    to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private 3    civil action when sought from the Board. However, the 4    Board is authorized to use such documents, materials, or 5    other information in furtherance of any regulatory or 6    legal action brought as part of the Board's official 7    duties. The Board shall not disclose the database or make 8    such documents, materials, or other information it has 9    obtained or that has been disclosed to it to the public. 10    Neither the Board nor any person who received documents, 11    materials or other information shared under this 12    subsection shall be required to testify in any private 13    civil action concerning the database or any confidential 14    documents, materials, or information subject to this 15    subsection.16    (d) The Board shall maintain a searchable database of law 17enforcement officers accessible to the public that shall 18include: (i) the law enforcement officer's employing agency; 19(ii) the date of the officer's initial certification and the 20officer's current certification status; and (iii) any 21sustained complaint of misconduct that resulted in 22decertification and the date thereof; provided, however, that 23information shall not be included in the database that would 24allow the public to ascertain the home address of an officer or 25another person; provided further, that information regarding 26an officer's or another person's family member shall not be   HB3641- 79 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1included in the database. The Board shall make the database 2publicly available on its website.3    (e) The Board shall maintain a searchable database of all 4completed investigations against law enforcement officers 5related to decertification. The database shall identify each 6law enforcement officer by a confidential and anonymous number 7and include: (i) the law enforcement officer's employing 8agency; (ii) the date of the incident referenced in the 9complaint; (iii) the location of the incident; (iv) the race 10and ethnicity of each officer involved in the incident; (v) 11the age, gender, race and ethnicity of each person involved in 12the incident, if known; (vi) whether a person in the 13complaint, including a law enforcement officer, was injured, 14received emergency medical care, was hospitalized or died as a 15result of the incident; (vii) the law enforcement agency or 16other entity assigned to conduct an investigation of the 17incident; (viii) when the investigation was completed; (ix) 18whether the complaint was sustained; and (x) the type of 19misconduct investigated; provided, however, that the Board 20shall redact or withhold such information as necessary to 21prevent the disclosure of the identity of an officer. The 22Board shall make the database publicly available on its 23website.24    (e-1) An investigation is complete when the investigation 25has either been terminated or the decertification action, 26including the administrative review process, has been   HB3641- 80 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1completed, whichever is later.2    (e-2) At any time, a law enforcement officer shall have 3access to the law enforcement officer's own records on file 4with the Board, as it pertains to the databases in this 5Section. 6    (f) (blank). Annual report. The Board shall submit an 7annual report to the Governor, Attorney General, President and 8Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority 9Leader of the House of Representatives on or before March 1, 102023, and every year thereafter indicating:11        (1) the number of complaints received in the preceding 12    calendar year, including but not limited to the race, 13    gender, and type of discretionary decertification 14    complaints received;15        (2) the number of investigations initiated in the 16    preceding calendar year since the date of the last report;17        (3) the number of investigations concluded in the 18    preceding calendar year;19        (4) the number of investigations pending as of the 20    last date of the preceding calendar year;21        (5) the number of hearings held in the preceding 22    calendar year; and23        (6) the number of officers decertified in the 24    preceding calendar year.25    The annual report shall be publicly available on the 26website of the Board.   HB3641- 81 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1     (g) Nothing in this Section shall exempt a law 2enforcement agency from which the Board has obtained data, 3documents, materials, or other information or that has 4disclosed data, documents, materials, or other information to 5the Board from disclosing public records in accordance with 6the Freedom of Information Act.7    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 8the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 9102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 101, 2022. 11(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 12    (50 ILCS 705/6.2 rep.)13    Section 10. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 14repealing Section 6.2.  HB3641- 82 -LRB104 12151 RTM 22250 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 705/2from Ch. 85, par. 5024    50 ILCS 705/6from Ch. 85, par. 5065    50 ILCS 705/6.16    50 ILCS 705/6.2-5 new7    50 ILCS 705/6.38    50 ILCS 705/6.4 new9    50 ILCS 705/8.1from Ch. 85, par. 508.110    50 ILCS 705/8.211    50 ILCS 705/8.312    50 ILCS 705/9.213    50 ILCS 705/6.2 rep.